Nebraska, session 109, LB562.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 37-438, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-438 (1) The commission shall devise annual, temporary, disabled
veteran, and active-duty military permits.
(2) The annual permit may be purchased by any person and shall be
valid through December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued. The
fee for the annual permit for a resident motor vehicle shall be not more
than fifty thirty-five dollars per permit. The fee for the annual permit
for a nonresident motor vehicle shall be two times the fee for a resident
motor vehicle or sixty dollars, whichever is greater. The commission
shall establish such fees by the adoption and promulgation of rules and
regulations.
(3) A temporary permit may be purchased by any person and shall be
valid until noon of the day following the date of issue. The fee for the
temporary permit for a resident motor vehicle shall be not more than ten
seven dollars. The fee for the temporary permit for a nonresident motor
vehicle shall be two times the fee for a resident motor vehicle or twelve
dollars, whichever is greater. The commission shall establish such fees
by the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations. The commission
may issue temporary permits which are either valid for any area or valid
for a single area.
(4)(a) A veteran who is a resident of Nebraska shall, upon
application and without payment of any fee, be issued one disabled
veteran permit for a resident motor vehicle if the veteran:
(i) Was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable
or general (under honorable conditions); and
(ii)(A) Is rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
as fifty percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed
forces of the United States; or
(B) Is receiving a pension from the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs as a result of total and permanent disability, which
-2-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
disability was not incurred in the line of duty in the military service.
(b) All disabled veteran permits issued pursuant to this subsection
shall be perpetual and shall become void only upon termination of
eligibility as provided in this subsection.
(5) An active-duty military permit may be purchased by any
individual who is active-duty military and shall be valid through
December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued. The fee for the
active-duty military permit is five dollars, regardless of residency. To
qualify for an active-duty military permit, the individual shall present:
(a) Such individual's military identification card; and
(b) Proof that such individual is stationed at a military base
located in Nebraska for active-duty military service.
(6) The commission may offer permits or combinations of permits at
temporarily reduced rates for specific events or during specified
timeframes.
(7) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Section 37-440, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-440 (1) The commission shall prescribe the type and design of
permits and the method for displaying permits on the driver's side of the
windshield of motor vehicles. The commission may provide for the
electronic issuance of permits and may enter into contracts to procure
necessary services and supplies for the electronic issuance of permits.
(2) The permits may be procured from the central and district
offices of the commission, at areas of the Nebraska state park system
where commission offices are maintained, from self-service vending
stations at designated park areas, from designated commission employees,
through Internet sales from the commission's website, from appropriate
offices of county government, and from various private persons, firms, or
corporations designated by the commission as permit agents. The
-3-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
commission and county offices or private persons, firms, or corporations
designated by the commission as permit agents shall be entitled to
collect and retain an issuing fee pursuant to section 37-406 a fee of not
more than one dollar, as established by the commission pursuant to
section 37-327, for each permit as reimbursement for the clerical work of
issuing the permits and remitting therefor. The commission shall be
entitled to collect and retain a fee of one dollar for each permit sold
through its website as reimbursement for the clerical work and postage
associated with issuing the permit.
Sec. 3. Section 37-451, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-451 (1) The commission may issue permits for hunting mountain
sheep and may adopt and promulgate separate and, when necessary,
different rules and regulations therefor within the limitations
prescribed in subsection (1) of section 37-447 and section 37-452 for
hunting deer. Such rules and regulations shall include provisions
allowing persons who find dead mountain sheep, or any part of a mountain
sheep, to turn over to the commission such mountain sheep or part of a
mountain sheep. The commission may dispose of such mountain sheep or part
of a mountain sheep as it deems reasonable and prudent. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the permits shall be issued to
residents of Nebraska.
(2) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and
charge a nonrefundable application fee of not more than thirty-four
dollars for permits issued only to residents. Any number of resident-only
permits, as authorized by the commission, shall be awarded by random
drawing to eligible applicants. No permit fee shall be charged in
addition to the nonrefundable application fee.
(3) No more than two one additional permits permit may be authorized
and issued pursuant to an auction open to residents and nonresidents. The
number of such permits shall not exceed the number of those awarded
-4-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The auction shall be
conducted according to rules and regulations prescribed by the
commission. Any money derived from the sale of permits by auction shall
be used only for perpetuation and management of mountain sheep, elk, and
deer.
(4) If the commission determines to limit the number of permits
issued for any or all management units, the commission shall by rule and
regulation determine eligibility requirements for the permits.
(5) A person may obtain only one mountain sheep permit in his or her
lifetime, except that an auction permit issued in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section to harvest a mountain sheep shall not
count against such total.
(6) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor and shall be fined at least five hundred dollars upon
conviction.
Sec. 4. Section 37-455, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-455 (1) The commission may issue a limited permit for deer,
antelope, wild turkey, or elk to a person who is a qualifying landowner
or leaseholder or a member of such person's immediate family as described
in this section. The commission may issue nonresident landowner limited
permits after preference has been given for the issuance of resident
permits as provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by
the commission. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a
permit shall be valid during the predetermined period established by the
commission pursuant to sections 37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or
37-457. Upon receipt of an application in proper form as prescribed by
the rules and regulations of the commission, the commission may issue (a)
a limited deer, antelope, or wild turkey permit valid for hunting on all
of the land which is owned or leased by the qualifying landowner or
-5-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
leaseholder if such lands are identified in the application or (b) a
limited elk permit valid for hunting on the entire elk management unit of
which the land of the qualifying landowner or leaseholder included in the
application is a part.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations prescribing procedures and forms and create requirements for
documentation by an applicant or permittee to determine whether the
applicant or permittee is a Nebraska resident and is a qualifying
landowner or leaseholder of the described property or is a member of the
immediate family of such qualifying landowner or leaseholder. The
commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that create
requirements for documentation to designate one qualifying landowner
among partners of a partnership or officers or shareholders of a
corporation that owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch
land for agricultural purposes and among beneficiaries of a trust that
owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch land for
agricultural purposes. Only a person who is a qualifying landowner or
leaseholder or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited permit. An applicant may apply for no more than one permit per
species per year except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section and the rules and regulations of the commission. For purposes of
this section, member of a person's immediate family means and is limited
to the spouse of such person, any child or stepchild of such person or of
the spouse of such person, any spouse of any such child or stepchild, any
grandchild or stepgrandchild of such person or of the spouse of such
person, any spouse of such grandchild or stepgrandchild, any sibling of
such person sharing ownership in the property, and any spouse of any such
sibling.
(b) The conditions applicable to permits issued pursuant to sections
37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or 37-457, whichever is appropriate,
shall apply to limited permits issued pursuant to this section, except
-6-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
that the commission may pass commission orders for species harvest
allocation pertaining to the sex and age of the species harvested which
are different for a limited permit than for other hunting permits. For
purposes of this section, white-tailed deer and mule deer shall be
treated as one species.
(3)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member
of such person's immediate family or (ii) is the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and
regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the
immediate family of the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary.
The number of limited permits issued annually per species for each farm
or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided
by eighty. The fee for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope shall be
one-half the fee for the regular permit for such species.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or
more of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural
purposes or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited deer or antelope permit. The number of limited permits issued
annually per species for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total
acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three hundred twenty. The fee for
such a permit to hunt deer or antelope shall be one-half the fee for a
nonresident permit to hunt such species.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
providing for the issuance of an additional limited deer permit to a
qualified individual for the taking of a deer without antlers at a fee
equal to or less than the fee for the original limited permit.
(4)(a) In addition to any limited permit to hunt deer issued to a
qualifying landowner under subsection (3) of this section, the commission
-7-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
shall issue up to eight limited permits to hunt deer during the three
days of Saturday through Monday immediately preceding the opening day of
firearm deer hunting season to any qualifying landowner meeting the
requirements of subdivision (b) of this subsection and designated members
of his or her immediate family. The fee for each permit issued under this
subsection shall be five dollars. Permits shall be issued subject to the
following:
(i) No more than eight permits may be issued per qualifying
landowner to the landowner or designated members of his or her immediate
family, except that no more than one permit shall be issued per person
for the qualifying landowner or any designated member of his or her
immediate family;
(ii) Of the eight permits that may be issued, no more than six
permits may be issued to persons who are younger than nineteen years of
age and no more than two permits may be issued to persons who are
nineteen years of age or older; and
(iii) For a Nebraska resident landowner, the number of permits
issued shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by
eighty, and for a nonresident landowner, the number of permits issued
shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three
hundred twenty.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the qualifying criteria for a
Nebraska resident described in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (ii) of this
section and the ownership criteria for a nonresident of Nebraska
described in subdivision (3)(b) of this section apply.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
(5)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member
of such person's immediate family or (ii) is the partner, officer,
-8-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and
regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the
immediate family of the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary.
The number of limited permits issued annually per season for each farm or
ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by
eighty. An applicant may apply for no more than one limited permit per
season. The fee for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey shall be one-
half the fee for the regular permit to hunt wild turkey.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or
more of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural
purposes or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited permit to hunt wild turkey. Only one limited wild turkey permit
per three hundred twenty acres may be issued annually for each wild
turkey season under this subdivision. The fee for such a permit to hunt
shall be one-half the fee for a nonresident permit to hunt wild turkey.
(6)(a) (6) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt elk, (a) the
applicant shall be (i) a Nebraska resident who owns three hundred twenty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes, or is the
partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the
qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided
in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section,
(ii) a Nebraska resident who leases six hundred forty acres or more of
farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or has a combined total of
six hundred forty leased and owned acres of or has a leasehold interest
and an ownership interest in farm or ranch land used for agricultural
purposes or is the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary
designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or
trust as provided in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a)
of this section which when added together totals at least six hundred
forty acres, (iii) a nonresident of Nebraska who owns at least one
-9-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
thousand two hundred eighty acres of farm or ranch land for agricultural
purposes, or is the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary
designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or
trust as provided in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a)
of this section, or (iv) a member of such owner's or lessee's immediate
family and (b) the qualifying farm or ranch land of the applicant shall
be within an area designated as an elk management zone by the commission
in its rules and regulations.
(b) An applicant shall not be issued a limited bull elk permit more
than once every three years, and the commission may give preference to a
person who did not receive a limited elk permit or a specified type of
limited elk permit during the previous years.
(c) The fee for a resident landowner limited permit to hunt elk
shall not exceed one-half the fee for the regular permit to hunt elk. The
fee for a nonresident landowner limited permit to hunt elk shall not
exceed three times the cost of a resident elk permit.
(d) The number of applications allowed for limited elk permits for
each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or
ranch divided by the minimum acreage requirements established for the
property. No more than one person may qualify for the same described
property.
Sec. 5. Section 37-1214, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-1214 (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 37-1211, the
owner of each motorboat shall register such vessel or renew the
registration every three years as provided in section 37-1226. The owner
of such vessel shall file an initial application for a certificate of
number pursuant to section 37-1216 with a county treasurer on forms
approved and provided by the commission. The application shall be signed
by the owner of the vessel, shall contain the year manufactured, and
shall be accompanied by a registration fee for the three-year period of
-10-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
twenty-eight dollars for Class 1 boats, fifty-one dollars for Class 2
boats, seventy-two dollars and fifty cents for Class 3 boats, and one
hundred twenty dollars for Class 4 boats. Of each motorboat registration
fee, not more than ten dollars may be used for the Aquatic Invasive
Species Program.
(2) The owner of a motorboat not registered in Nebraska shall
purchase an aquatic invasive species stamp for the Aquatic Invasive
Species Program valid for one calendar year prior to launching into any
waters of the state. The cost of such one-year stamp shall be established
pursuant to section 37-327 and be not less than ten dollars and not more
than thirty fifteen dollars plus an issuance fee pursuant to section
37-406. Such one-year stamp may be purchased electronically or through
any vendor authorized by the commission to sell other permits and stamps
issued under the Game Law pursuant to section 37-406. The aquatic
invasive species stamp shall be permanently affixed on the starboard and
rearward side of the vessel. The proceeds from the sale of stamps shall
be remitted to the State Game Fund.
(3) This subsection applies beginning on an implementation date
designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles in cooperation with the
commission. The director shall designate an implementation date on or
before January 1, 2021, for motorboat registration. In addition to the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, the
application for registration shall contain (a)(i) the full legal name as
defined in section 60-468.01 of each owner or (ii) the name of each owner
as such name appears on the owner's motor vehicle operator's license or
state identification card and (b)(i) the motor vehicle operator's license
number or state identification card number of each owner, if applicable,
and one or more of the identification elements as listed in section
60-484 of each owner, if applicable, and (ii) if any owner is a business
entity, a nonprofit organization, an estate, a trust, or a church-
controlled organization, its tax identification number.
-11-

LB562 LB562
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Original section 37-440, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 37-438, 37-451, 37-455, and 37-1214, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-